src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_poovsa_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - poovsâ: # ok, PASS
    poovsâ+N+Sg+Nom: poovsâ
    poovsâ+N+Sg+Gen: poksâm
    poovsâ+N+Sg+Acc: poksâm
    poovsâ+N+Sg+Ill: poksâmân
    poovsâ+N+Sg+Loc: poksâmist
    poovsâ+N+Sg+Com: poksâmáin
    poovsâ+N+Sg+Abe: poksâmttáá
    poovsâ+N+Ess: poovsân
    poovsâ+N+Par: poovsâd
    poovsâ+N+Pl+Nom: poksâmeh
    poovsâ+N+Pl+Gen: poksâmij
    poovsâ+N+Pl+Acc: poksâmijd
    poovsâ+N+Pl+Ill: poksâmáid
    poovsâ+N+Pl+Loc: poksâmijn
    poovsâ+N+Pl+Com: [poksâmijguin, poksâmijgijn]
    poovsâ+N+Pl+Abe: poksâmijttáá

  Noun - kuolbâ: # ok
    kuolbâ+N+Sg+Nom: kuolbâ
    kuolbâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuolbân
    kuolbâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuolbân
    kuolbâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuolbânân
    kuolbâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuolbânist
    kuolbâ+N+Sg+Com: kuolbânáin
    kuolbâ+N+Sg+Abe: kuolbânttáá
    kuolbâ+N+Ess: kuolbân
    kuolbâ+N+Par: kuolbâd
    kuolbâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuolbâneh
    kuolbâ+N+Pl+Gen: kuolbânij
    kuolbâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuolbânijd
    kuolbâ+N+Pl+Ill: kuolbânáid
    kuolbâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuolbânijn
    kuolbâ+N+Pl+Com: [kuolbânijguin, kuolbânijgijn]
    kuolbâ+N+Pl+Abe: kuolbânijttáá

  Noun - njuovčâ: # ok
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Nom: njuovčâ
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Gen: njuohčâm
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Acc: njuohčâm
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Ill: njuohčâmân
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Loc: njuohčâmist
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Com: njuohčâmáin
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Abe: njuohčâmttáá
    njuovčâ+N+Ess: njuovčân
    njuovčâ+N+Par: njuovčâd
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Nom: njuohčâmeh
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Gen: njuohčâmij
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Acc: njuohčâmijd
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Ill: njuohčâmáid
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Loc: njuohčâmijn
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Com: [njuohčâmijguin, njuohčâmijgijn]
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Abe: njuohčâmijttáá
 
  Noun - oođâ: # ok
    oođâ+N+Sg+Nom: oođâ
    oođâ+N+Sg+Gen: ođđâm
    oođâ+N+Sg+Acc: ođđâm
    oođâ+N+Sg+Ill: ođđâmân
    oođâ+N+Sg+Loc: ođđâmist
    oođâ+N+Sg+Com: ođđâmáin
    oođâ+N+Sg+Abe: ođđâmttáá
    oođâ+N+Ess: oođân
    oođâ+N+Par: oođâd
    oođâ+N+Pl+Nom: ođđâmeh
    oođâ+N+Pl+Gen: ođđâmij
    oođâ+N+Pl+Acc: ođđâmijd
    oođâ+N+Pl+Ill: ođđâmáid
    oođâ+N+Pl+Loc: ođđâmijn
    oođâ+N+Pl+Com: [ođđâmijguin, ođđâmijgijn]
    oođâ+N+Pl+Abe: ođđâmijttáá

  Noun - vaaskâ: # ok
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Nom: vaaskâ
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Gen: vaskâm
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Acc: vaskâm
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Ill: vaskâmân
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Loc: vaskâmist
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Com: vaskâmáin
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Abe: vaskâmttáá
    vaaskâ+N+Ess: vaaskân
    vaaskâ+N+Par: vaaskâd
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Nom: vaskâmeh
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Gen: vaskâmij
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Acc: vaskâmijd
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Ill: vaskâmáid
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Loc: vaskâmijn
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Com: [vaskâmijguin, vaskâmijgijn]
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Abe: vaskâmijttáá

  Noun - iištâ: # ok
    iištâ+N+Sg+Nom: iištâ
    iištâ+N+Sg+Gen: ištâm
    iištâ+N+Sg+Acc: ištâm
    iištâ+N+Sg+Ill: ištâmân
    iištâ+N+Sg+Loc: ištâmist
    iištâ+N+Sg+Com: ištâmáin
    iištâ+N+Sg+Abe: ištâmttáá
    iištâ+N+Ess: iištân
    iištâ+N+Par: iištâd
    iištâ+N+Pl+Nom: ištâmeh
    iištâ+N+Pl+Gen: ištâmij
    iištâ+N+Pl+Acc: ištâmijd
    iištâ+N+Pl+Ill: ištâmáid
    iištâ+N+Pl+Loc: ištâmijn
    iištâ+N+Pl+Com: [ištâmijguin, ištâmijgijn]
    iištâ+N+Pl+Abe: ištâmijttáá

  Noun - kaaljâ: # ok
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Sg+Nom: kaaljâ
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Sg+Gen: kaljâm
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Sg+Acc: kaljâm
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Sg+Ill: kaljâmân
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Sg+Loc: kaljâmist
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Sg+Com: kaljâmáin
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Sg+Abe: kaljâmttáá
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Ess: kaaljân
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Par: kaaljâd
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Pl+Nom: kaljâmeh
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Pl+Gen: kaljâmij
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Pl+Acc: kaljâmijd
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Pl+Ill: kaljâmáid
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Pl+Loc: kaljâmijn
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Pl+Com: [kaljâmijguin, kaljâmijgijn]
    kaaljâ+v1+N+Pl+Abe: kaljâmijttáá
